South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3438.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Catawba Indian Reservation Expansion SECTION 1.    The General Assembly approves Ordinance Number 3421 adopted on September 7, 2021, by the York County Council to expand the Catawba Indian Reservation, as requested by the Catawba Indian Nation. Time effective SECTION 2.    This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of March, 2025. Approved the 7th day of March, 2025. __________